Utah statutes.
17D-3-303.   Nominating committee nomination of candidates for election to the board of supervisors.

The nominating committee under Subsection 17D-3-302(1)(a) shall:

(1)  nominate for each conservation district election a slate of candidates for election to the board of supervisors of the conservation district equal in number to at least one more than the number of board of supervisors members to be elected; and

(2)  submit the names of candidates to the commission no later than the date set by the commission as the close of nominations.

